apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON Personal
manne+Pron+Pers+Sg1:m firstperspronsg ;
manne+Pron+Pers+Du1:m firstpersprondu ;
manne+Pron+Pers+Pl1:m perspronpl ;
datne+Pron+Pers+Sg2:d nonfirstperspronsg ;
datne+Pron+Pers+Du2:d nonfirstpersprondu ;
datne+Pron+Pers+Pl2:d perspronpl ;
satne+Pron+Pers+Sg3:s nonfirstperspronsg ;
satne+Pron+Pers+Du3:s nonfirstpersprondu ;
satne+Pron+Pers+Pl3:s perspronpl ;
DIHTE ; ! this is for personal pronoun use of dïhte


! Lexica for sg
! - - - - - - - 

LEXICON firstperspronsg ! First pers has special consonantism
shortproncase ;
:anne longproncase ;
+Ill:unnjien FINAL1 ;
+Ill:unnjan FINAL1 ;

LEXICON nonfirstperspronsg ! 2nd and 3rd are identical
shortproncase ;
:atne longproncase ;
+Ill:utnjien FINAL1 ;
+Ill:utnjan FINAL1 ;


! Lexica for du
! - - - - - - - 

LEXICON firstpersprondu
+Nom:in FINAL1 ;
+Nom:ånnoeh FINAL1 ;
+Nom:onnoej FINAL1 ;
+Gen:onnen FINAL1 ;
+Ill:onnese FINAL1 ;
:onne longproncase ;

LEXICON nonfirstpersprondu
+Nom:in FINAL1 ;
+Nom:åtnoeh FINAL1 ;
+Nom:otnoej FINAL1 ;
+Gen:otnen FINAL1 ;
+Ill:otnese FINAL1 ;
:otne longproncase ;



! Lexica for pl
! - - - - - - - 

LEXICON perspronpl
+Nom:ih FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:ijjieh FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:ijje FINAL1 ;
+Acc:ijjem FINAL1 ;
+Gen:ijjen FINAL1 ;
+Ill:ijjese FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Use/NG:ijjide FINAL1 ; 
+Ine:ijjesne FINAL1 ;
+Ela:ijjeste FINAL1 ;
+Com:ijjeX2ine FINAL1 ;


! Common case lexica
! - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON shortproncase
+Gen+Use/NG:ov FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:ån FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:an FINAL1 ;

LEXICON longproncase
+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+Acc:m FINAL1 ;
+Ine:sne FINAL1 ;
+Ela:ste FINAL1 ;
+Com:X2ine FINAL1 ;



LEXICON DIHTE
! this is a personal pronoun
! demonstrative dïhte is treated below.
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:dïhte FINAL1 ;  
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:dam FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc+Use/NG:altemse FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen:dan FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:altese FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:elties FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:eltie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill:dïsse FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:altasasse FINAL1 ;!dïhte


dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine:desnie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela:destie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela+Use/NG:altasistie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com:dejnie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com+Use/NG:altasinie FINAL1 ;  

dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:dah FINAL1 ;  
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:dejtie FINAL1 ;  
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen:daj FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen+Use/NG:dej FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen+Use/NG:altese FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill:dejtie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:altasissie FINAL1 ;!dïhte 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ine:dejnie FINAL1 ;  
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela:dejstie FINAL1 ; 
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com:dejgujmie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com+Use/NG:dajgujmie FINAL1 ;

dïhte+Pron+Pers+Du3+Gen:altesigan FINAL1 ; 


! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

! This is for:
! the attributive forms of dïhte
! all forms of the other pronouns

! The initial demonstrative lexica
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON INTERR
+Sg+Ine:snie FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine+Use/NG:nnie FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ela:stie FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:jnie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:jtie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:j FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ill:jtie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:jnie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ela:jstie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com:jgujmie FINAL1 ;


! Indefinite pronouns
! -------------------

LEXICON indeven-e
+Pron+Indef+Sg: indsg-e ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: indpl-e ;
+Pron+Indef: indess ;

LEXICON indeven-a
+Pron+Indef+Sg: indsg-a ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: indpl-a ;
+Pron+Indef: indess ;


!kongruensContlex
LEXICON muvhtiecase
+Pron+Indef+Sg: muvhtiesg ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: muvhtiepl ;


LEXICON indodd ! This lexicon cannot be removed before lexica pointing here
! get another contlex!
+Pron+Indef+Sg: indsg_odd ;
+Pron+Indef+Pl: indpl_odd ;
+Pron+Indef: indess_odd ;

LEXICON ind_noninfl
+Pron+Indef: FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indsg-e
+Nom:e FINAL1 ;
+Acc:e%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:e%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ill:e%>se FINAL1 ;
+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1 ;
+Ine+Attr:e%>ne # ;
+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indsg-a
+Nom:a FINAL1 ;
+Acc:a%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:a%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ill:e%>se FINAL1 ;
+Ine:e%>sne FINAL1 ;
+Ine+Attr:e%>ne # ;
+Ela:e%>ste FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;



LEXICON indpl-e
+Nom:%>h FINAL1 ;
+Acc:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Gen:%>i FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Ine:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>igujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indpl-a
+Nom:a%>h FINAL1 ;
+Nom:a%>ah FINAL1 ; !XXX check 
+Acc:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Gen:a%>j FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>ide FINAL1 ;
+Ine:%>ine FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1 ;
+Com:a%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;


LEXICON indess
+Ess:%>ine FINAL1 ;


!KongruensContLex
LEXICON muvhtiesg
+Nom:ie FINAL1 ;
+Acc:ie%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:ie%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Attr:ie%>n # ;
+Ine+Attr:%>ine # ;
+Ela+Attr:%>ide # ;
+Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;

!KongruensContLex
LEXICON muvhtiepl
+Nom:ie FINAL1 ;
+Acc:ie%>m FINAL1 ;
+Gen:ie%>n FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Attr:ie%>n # ;
+Ine+Attr:i%>ne # ;
+Ela+Attr:i%>de # ;
+Com:%>ne FINAL1 ;



LEXICON indsg_odd
+Nom:e%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;
+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1 ;
+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>asse FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+Ine:%>isnie FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>istie FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>inie FINAL1 ;




LEXICON indpl_odd
+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh FINAL1 ;
+Acc:%>idie FINAL1 ;
+Gen:%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1 ;
+Ill:%>idie FINAL1 ;
+Ine:%>inie FINAL1 ;
+Ela:%>ijstie FINAL1 ;
+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indess_odd
+Ess:%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON indcoll
+Pron+Coll+Pl: indpl_odd ;



! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON Reflexive

jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom:jïjtje FINAL1 ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom:jeetje FINAL1 ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom:ijtje FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:altemse FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:altese FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG:elties FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG:eltie FINAL1 ;



jïjtje+Pron+Refl:jïjtj OBLREFL ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl:jïjt  OBLREFL-NONPAL ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl:jïj  OBLREFL-NONPAL2 ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom:jïjtjh FINAL1 ;
jïjtje+Pron+Refl+Du+Nom:jïjtjh FINAL1 ;

LEXICON OBLREFL
+Acc+PxSg1:eme  FINAL1 ;
+Acc+PxDu1+Use/Sub:eme  FINAL1 ;!
+Acc+PxPl1+Use/Sub:eme  FINAL1 ;!
+Acc+PxSg1:emem FINAL1 ;
+Acc+PxDu1:emem FINAL1 ;
+Acc+PxPl1:emem FINAL1 ;

+Acc+PxSg2:emdh FINAL1 ;
+Acc+PxDu2:emdh FINAL1 ;
+Acc+PxPl2:emdh FINAL1 ;

+Acc+PxSg3:emse FINAL1 ;
+Acc+PxDu3+Use/Sub:emse FINAL1 ;! - iflg. KB s.122 - but this is not according to southsámi speakers as to day
+Acc+PxPL3+Use/Sub:emse FINAL1 ;! - iflg. KB s.122 - but this is not according to southsámi speakers as to day
+Acc+PxPl3:emsh FINAL1 ;
+Acc+PxDu3:emsh FINAL1 ;

+Gen+PxSg1+Use/Sub:ene FINAL1 ;!
+Gen+PxSg1:en  FINAL1 ;
+Gen+PxPl1:emh FINAL1 ;
+Gen+PxDu1:emh FINAL1 ;

+Gen+PxSg2:edh FINAL1 ;
+Gen+PxDu2:edh FINAL1 ;
+Gen+PxPl2:edh FINAL1 ;

+Gen+PxSg3+Use/Sub:ese FINAL1 ; !
+Gen+PxDu3+Use/Sub:esh FINAL1 ; !
+Gen+PxPl3+Use/Sub:esh FINAL1 ; !

! -----look  OBLREFL-NONPAL ;
+Ill+PxPl1:emidie FINAL1 ;!
+Ill+PxDu2:sadth  FINAL1 ;
+Ill+PxPl2:sadth  FINAL1 ;


+Ine+PxSg1:emisnie FINAL1 ;
+Ine+PxSg2:enadth FINAL1 ;
+Ine+PxSg3:isnie FINAL1 ;

+Ine+PxPl1:isnie FINAL1 ;
+Ine+PxDu2:enadth FINAL1 ;
+Ine+PxPl2:enadth FINAL1 ;

+Ela+PxSg1:estanne  FINAL1 ;!KB
+Ela+PxSg2:estadth  FINAL1 ;!KB and ÅW / HB
+Ela+PxSg3:estissie FINAL1 ;!KB
+Ela+PxSg1:enistie  FINAL1 ;!ÅW og HB
+Ela+PxPl1:estanne  FINAL1 ;!KB
+Ela+PxPl2:estadth  FINAL1 ;!KB
+Ela+PxPl3:estissie FINAL1 ;!KB

+Ela+PxDu1:isti FINAL1 ; !ÅW and HB
+Ela+PxPl1:isti FINAL1 ; !ÅW and HB

+Com+PxSg1:enæjnene FINAL1 ;!KB
+Com+PxSg2:enæjnedh FINAL1 ;!KB
+Com+PxSg1+Use/NG:eninie FINAL1 ;!ÅW and HB
+Com+PxSg2+Use/NG:enedh FINAL1 ;!ÅW and ÅW
+Com+PxPl1:enæjnene FINAL1 ;
+Com+PxPl2:enæjnedh FINAL1 ;
+Com+PxPl2+Use/NG:eminie FINAL1 ;!ÅW and HB
+Com+PxDu2:eminie FINAL1 ;!ÅW and HB

+Com+PxPl2:enadth FINAL1 ;!ÅW and HB
+Com+PxDu2:enadth FINAL1 ;!ÅW and HB

LEXICON Interrogative
gie+Pron+Interr:gie INTERR ;
mij+Pron+Interr:me INTERR ;
gie+Pron+Rel:gie INTERR ;
mij+Pron+Rel:me INTERR ;
LEXICON Indefinite
abpe ind_noninfl "hele" ; !probably does not have inflection, so it was removed
dovne:dovn indeven-e "helt, alt" ;
dovnesh:dovnes indcoll "alle" ;
eatjah:eatj indeven-a "annen, de andre" ;
eatjah:eatj indeven-e "annen, de andre" ; 
fïereguhte:fïereguht indeven-e "hver og en" ;
fïerhte:fïerht indeven-e "hver, hverthver" ;
gaajhke:gaajhk indeven-e "alle" ;
gaajhkesh:gaajhkes indcoll "alle sammen" ;
gallesh:gallas indcoll "mange sammen" ;
gellie ind_noninfl "mange" ; !also inessive for gellene e.g. gellene lehkesne - på många ställen. Example in Åarjelsaemien 6 (2000:6).
gellieh ind_noninfl ; 
gille:gill indeven-e "noen få" ;
gillesh:gilles indcoll "noen få sammen" ;
gåabpatjahkh:gåabpatjahk indeven-e "både" ;
jeatja:jeatj indeven-a "annen, de andre"  ;
jeatjh:jeatj indeven-e "annen, de andre"  ;
jeatjebe:jeatjab indodd "en annen, noe annet; flt. jeatjebh  andre" ;
jeene:jeen indeven-e "mange, mye" ;
jeenje:jeenj indeven-e "mange, mye" ; !It's uncertain if this word can be inflected in all these cases
jeenjemes+Pron+Indef+Pl:jeenjemes indpl-e "de fleste" ;
jeenjemes+Pron+Indef:jeenjemes indess ;
jeenjesh:jeenjes indcoll "mange sammen" ;
jienebe:jienieb indodd "flere" ;
jïenesh+Use/Sub:jienes indcoll "mange sammen" ; !
jïjnjesh+Use/Sub:jijnjes indcoll "mange sammen" ; !
jïjnjh+Use/Sub:jijnj indeven-e "mange, mye" ;!
jïenesh:jïenes indcoll "mange sammen" ;
jïjnje:jïjnj indeven-e "mange, mye" ;
jïjnjesh:jïjnjes indcoll "mange sammen" ;
jïjnjh:jïjnj indeven-e "mange, mye" ;
muvhte:muvht indeven-e "noen" ; 
muvhtie:muvht muvhtiecase "noen" ;
måadtesh:måadtas indcoll "mangen" ;
måedtie:måedt muvhtiecase "mange"  ;
naakene:naaken indodd "noen, noe" ; !this most be pointed towards another lexicon due to it being three-syllabic
naan ind_noninfl "noen, noe" ;
seamma ind_noninfl "samme" ; !XXX
såamesh:såamas indcoll "noen, noe" ;
såamesh+Use/Sub:såames indcoll "noen, noe" ; !
såemies ind_noninfl "noen, noe" ;
åbpe ind_noninfl "hele" ; !probably does not have inflection, so it was removed
